Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE G. CORRECTIONS

CHAPTER 501. INMATE WELFARE

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL WELFARE PROVISIONS

Sec. 501.001. DISCRIMINATION AGAINST INMATES PROHIBITED. The institutional division and the director of the institutional division may not discriminate against an inmate on the basis of the inmate's sex, race, color, creed, or national origin.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.001 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 501.002. ASSAULT BY EMPLOYEE ON INMATE. If an employee of the department commits an assault on an inmate housed in a facility operated by or under contract with the department, the executive director shall file a complaint with the proper official of the county in which the offense occurred. If an employee is charged with an assault described by this section, an inmate or person who was an inmate at the time of the alleged offense may testify in a prosecution of the offense.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.002 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.070, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 501.003. FOOD. The department shall ensure that inmates housed in facilities operated by the department are fed good and wholesome food, prepared under sanitary conditions, and provided in sufficient quantity and reasonable variety. The department shall hold employees charged with preparing food for inmates strictly to account for a failure to carry out this section. The department shall provide for the training of inmates as cooks so that food for inmates may be properly prepared.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.003 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.071, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 501.004. CLOTHING. The department shall provide to inmates housed in facilities operated by the department suitable clothing that is of substantial material, uniform make, and reasonable fit and footwear that is substantial and comfortable. The department may not allow an inmate to wear clothing that is not furnished by the department, except as a reward for meritorious conduct. The department may allow inmates to wear underwear not furnished by the department.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.004 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.072, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 501.005. LITERACY PROGRAMS. (a) The institutional division shall establish a program to teach reading to functionally illiterate inmates housed in facilities operated by the division. The institutional division shall allow an inmate who is capable of serving as a tutor to tutor functionally illiterate inmates and shall actively encourage volunteer organizations to aid in the tutoring of inmates. The institutional division, the inmate to be tutored, and the person who tutors the inmate jointly shall establish reading goals for the inmate to be tutored. A person who acts as a tutor may only function as a teacher and advisor to an inmate and may not exercise supervisory authority or control over the inmate.

(b) The institutional division shall require illiterate inmates housed in facilities operated by the division to receive not less than five or more than eight hours a week of reading instruction.

(c) The institutional division shall identify functionally illiterate inmates housed in facilities operated by the division and shall inform the parole division if it determines that an inmate who is to be released to the supervision of the parole division is in need of continuing education after release from the institutional division.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.005 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.073, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 501.0051. RECEIPT OF BOOKS BY MAIL. (a) The department shall establish a policy that permits an inmate to receive by mail reference books and other educational materials from a volunteer organization that operates programs described by Section 501.009, regardless of whether the organization provides those programs to inmates housed in facilities operated by the department.

(b) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section, including rules to:

(1) provide for screening of packages sent to inmates;

(2) prohibit inmates from receiving books that might assist them in committing crimes, such as books on escaping prison; and

(3) define the terms "reference books" and "educational materials."

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 976 (H.B. 3649), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 501.006. EMERGENCY ABSENCE. (a) The institutional division may grant an emergency absence under escort to an inmate so that the inmate may:

(1) obtain a medical diagnosis or medical treatment;

(2) obtain treatment and supervision at a facility operated by the Health and Human Services Commission; or

(3) attend a funeral or visit a critically ill relative.

(b) The institutional division shall adopt policies for the administration of the emergency absence under escort program.

(c) An inmate absent under this section is considered to be in the custody of the institutional division, and the inmate must be under physical guard while absent.

(d) The institutional division may not grant a furlough to an inmate convicted of an offense under Section 42.072, Penal Code.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.006 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 10, Sec. 7, eff. March 19, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 14.36, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.074, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 657, Sec. 7, eff. June 14, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 9, eff. Jan. 28, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 446), Sec. 5.11, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 501.007. INMATE CLAIMS FOR LOST OR DAMAGED PROPERTY. The department may pay from the miscellaneous funds appropriated to the division claims made by inmates housed in facilities operated by the department for property lost or damaged by the division. The department shall maintain a record of all transactions made under this section. The record must show the amount of each claim paid, the identity of each claimant, and the purpose for which each claim was made. The department may not pay under this section more than $500 on a claim.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.007 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.075, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 8, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 501.008. INMATE GRIEVANCE SYSTEM. (a) The department shall develop and maintain a system for the resolution of grievances by inmates housed in facilities operated by the department or under contract with the department that qualifies for certification under 42 U.S.C. Section 1997e and the department shall obtain and maintain certification under that section. A remedy provided by the grievance system is the exclusive administrative remedy available to an inmate for a claim for relief against the department that arises while the inmate is housed in a facility operated by the department or under contract with the department, other than a remedy provided by writ of habeas corpus challenging the validity of an action occurring before the delivery of the inmate to the department or to a facility operated under contract with the department.

(b) The grievance system must provide procedures:

(1) for an inmate to identify evidence to substantiate the inmate's claim; and

(2) for an inmate to receive all formal written responses to the inmate's grievance.

(c) A report, investigation, or supporting document prepared by the department in response to an inmate grievance is considered to have been prepared in anticipation of litigation and is confidential, privileged, and not subject to discovery by the inmate in a claim arising out of the same operative facts as are alleged in the grievance.

(d) An inmate may not file a claim in state court regarding operative facts for which the grievance system provides the exclusive administrative remedy until:

(1) the inmate receives a written decision issued by the highest authority provided for in the grievance system; or

(2) if the inmate has not received a written decision described by Subdivision (1), the 180th day after the date the grievance is filed.

(e) The limitations period applicable to a claim arising out of the same operative facts as a claim for which the grievance system provides the exclusive remedy:

(1) is suspended on the filing of the grievance; and

(2) remains suspended until the earlier of the following dates:

(A) the 180th day after the date the grievance is filed; or

(B) the date the inmate receives the written decision described by Subsection (d)(1).

(f) This section does not affect any immunity from a claim for damages that otherwise exists for the state, the department, or an employee of the department.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.008 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 378, Sec. 6, eff. June 8, 1995.

Sec. 501.0081. DISPUTE RESOLUTION: TIME-SERVED CREDITS. (a) The department shall develop a system that allows resolution of a complaint by an inmate who alleges that time credited on the inmate's sentence is in error and does not accurately reflect the amount of time-served credit to which the inmate is entitled.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), an inmate may not in an application for a writ of habeas corpus under Article 11.07, Code of Criminal Procedure, raise as a claim a time-served credit error until:

(1) the inmate receives a written decision issued by the highest authority provided for in the resolution system; or

(2) if the inmate has not received a written decision described by Subdivision (1), the 180th day after the date on which under the resolution system the inmate first alleges the time-served credit error.

(c) Subsection (b) does not apply to an inmate who, according to the department's computations, is within 180 days of the inmate's presumptive parole date, date of release on mandatory supervision, or date of discharge. An inmate described by this subsection may raise a claim of time-served credit error by filing a complaint under the system described by Subsection (a) or, if an application for a writ of habeas corpus is not otherwise barred, by raising the claim in that application.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1188, Sec. 1.38(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 501.009. VOLUNTEER AND FAITH-BASED ORGANIZATIONS; REPORT. (a) The department shall adopt a policy that requires each warden to identify volunteer and faith-based organizations that provide programs for inmates housed in facilities operated by the department. The policy must require each warden to actively encourage volunteer and faith-based organizations to provide the following programs for inmates in the warden's facility:

(1) literacy and education programs;

(2) life skills programs;

(3) job skills programs;

(4) parent-training programs;

(5) drug and alcohol rehabilitation programs;

(6) support group programs;

(7) arts and crafts programs; and

(8) other programs determined by the department to aid inmates in the transition between confinement and society and to reduce incidence of recidivism among inmates.

(b) The policy must require that each warden submit a report to the board not later than December 31 of each year that includes, for the preceding fiscal year, a summary of:

(1) the programs provided to inmates under this section; and

(2) the actions taken by the warden to identify volunteer and faith-based organizations willing to provide programs to inmates and to encourage those organizations to provide programs in the warden's facility.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.009 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.076, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1406 (S.B. 345), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 501.010. VISITORS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Guardian" has the meaning assigned by Section 1002.012, Estates Code.

(2) "Letters of guardianship" means a certificate issued under Section 1106.001(a), Estates Code.

(a-1) The institutional division shall allow the governor, members of the legislature, and members of the executive and judicial branches to enter at proper hours any part of a facility operated by the division where inmates are housed or worked, for the purpose of observing the operations of the division. A visitor described by this subsection may talk with inmates away from institutional division employees.

(b) The institutional division shall have a uniform visitation policy that allows eligible inmates housed in facilities operated by the division, other than state jails, to receive visitors. The institutional division shall require each warden in the division to:

(1) apply the policy in the unit under the warden's control;

(2) prominently display copies of the policy in locations in the unit that are accessible to inmates or visitors; and

(3) if requested, provide visitors with copies of the policy.

(b-1) The uniform visitation policy must:

(1) allow visitation by a guardian of an inmate to the same extent as the inmate's next of kin, including placing the guardian on the inmate's approved visitors list on the guardian's request and providing the guardian access to the inmate during a facility's standard visitation hours if the inmate is otherwise eligible to receive visitors; and

(2) require the guardian to provide the warden with letters of guardianship before being allowed to visit the inmate.

(b-2) Regardless of the implementation of video visitation or visitation by other electronic means, the uniform visitation policy must allow in-person visitation for eligible inmates, provided that the policy may allow the temporary suspension of in-person visitation for a health or safety emergency.

(c) At the end of each biennium, each warden in the institutional division shall report to the director of the division on the manner in which the policy has affected visitation at the warden's unit during the preceding two years.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.010 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.077, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 688 (H.B. 634), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 328 (H.B. 2708), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 501.011. ZERO-TOLERANCE POLICY. (a) The department shall adopt a zero-tolerance policy concerning the detection, prevention, and punishment of the sexual abuse, including consensual sexual contact, of inmates in the custody of the department.

(b) The department shall establish standards for reporting and collecting data on the sexual abuse of inmates in the custody of the department.

(c) The department shall establish a procedure for inmates in the custody of the department and department employees to report incidents of sexual abuse involving an inmate in the custody of the department. The procedure must designate a person employed at the department facility in which the abuse is alleged to have occurred as well as a person who is employed at the department's headquarters to whom a person may report an incident of sexual abuse.

(d) The department shall prominently display the following notice in the office of the chief administrator of each department facility, the employees' break room of each department facility, the cafeteria of each department facility, and at least six additional locations in each department facility:

THE TEXAS LEGISLATURE HAS ADOPTED A ZERO-TOLERANCE POLICY REGARDING THE SEXUAL ABUSE, INCLUDING CONSENSUAL SEXUAL CONTACT, OF AN INMATE IN THE CUSTODY OF THE DEPARTMENT. ANY SUCH VIOLATION MUST BE REPORTED TO __________.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 23, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 501.012. FAMILY LIAISON OFFICER. The director of the institutional division shall designate one employee at each facility operated by the institutional division to serve as family liaison officer for that facility. The family liaison officer shall facilitate the maintenance of ties between inmates and their families for the purpose of reducing recidivism. Each family liaison officer shall:

(1) provide inmates' relatives with information about the classification status, location, and health of inmates in the facility;

(2) notify inmates about emergencies involving their families and provide inmates with other necessary information relating to their families; and

(3) assist inmates' relatives and other persons during visits with inmates and aid those persons in resolving problems that may affect permitted contact with inmates.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.012 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.079, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 501.013. MATERIALS USED FOR ARTS AND CRAFTS. (a) The institutional division may purchase materials to be used by inmates housed in facilities operated by the division to produce arts and crafts.

(b) The institutional division may allow an inmate housed in a facility operated by the division who produces arts and crafts in the division to sell those arts and crafts to the general public in a manner determined by the division.

(c) If an inmate housed in a facility operated by the division sells arts and crafts and the materials used in the production of the arts and crafts were provided by the division, the proceeds of the sale go first to the division to pay for the cost of the materials, and the remainder, if any, goes to the inmate. The institutional division may not purchase more than $30 of materials for any inmate unless the inmate has repaid the division in full for previous purchases of materials.

(d) The manufacturing and logistics division and the institutional division shall work cooperatively in supervising the production and sale of arts and crafts under this section.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.013 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.080, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1056, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 501.014. INMATE MONEY. (a) The department shall take possession of all money that an inmate has on the inmate's person or that is received with the inmate when the inmate arrives at a facility to be admitted to the custody of the department and all money the inmate receives at the department during confinement and shall credit the money to an account created for the inmate. The department may spend money from an inmate account on the written order of the inmate in whose name the account is established or as required by law or policy subject to restrictions on the expenditure established by law or policy. The department shall ensure that each facility operated by or under contract with the department shall operate an account system that complies with this section, but the department is not required to operate a separate account system for or at each facility.

(b) If an inmate with money in an account established under Subsection (a) dies while confined in a facility operated by or under contract with the department, the department shall attempt to give notice of the account to a beneficiary or known relative of the deceased inmate. On the presentation of a notarized claim to the department for the money by a person entitled to the notice, the department may pay any amount not exceeding $2,500 of the deceased inmate's money held by the department to the claimant. A claim for money in excess of $2,500 must be made under Chapter 205, Estates Code, or another law, as applicable. The department is not liable for making a payment or failing to make a payment under this subsection.

(c) If money is unclaimed two years after the department gives or attempts to give notice under Subsection (b), or two years after the date of the death of an inmate whose beneficiary or relative is unknown, the executive director, or the executive director's designee, shall make an affidavit stating that the money in the inmate account is unclaimed and send the affidavit and money to the comptroller.

(d) An inmate who escapes or attempts to escape from the custody of the department forfeits to the department all of the money held by the department in the inmate's account at the time of the escape or attempted escape. Money forfeited to the comptroller under Subsection (c) escheats to the state.

(e) On notification by a court, the department shall withdraw from an inmate's account any amount the inmate is ordered to pay by order of the court under this subsection. On receipt of a valid court order requiring an inmate to pay child support, the department shall withdraw the appropriate amount from the inmate's account under this subsection, regardless of whether the court order is provided by the court or another person. The department shall make a payment under this subsection to either the court or the party specified in the court order. The department is not liable for withdrawing or failing to withdraw money or making payments or failing to make payments under this subsection. The department shall make withdrawals and payments from an inmate's account under this subsection according to the following schedule of priorities:

(1) as payment in full for all orders for child support;

(2) as payment in full for all orders for restitution;

(3) as payment in full for all orders for reimbursement of the Health and Human Services Commission for financial assistance provided for the child's health needs under Chapter 31, Human Resources Code, to a child of the inmate;

(4) as payment in full for all orders for court fees and costs;

(5) as payment in full for all orders for fines; and

(6) as payment in full for any other court order, judgment, or writ.

(e-1) Notification from a court under Subsection (e) of an order for restitution must specify the amount of restitution owed on the date of notification.

(f) The department may place a hold on money in or withdraw money from an inmate account:

(1) to restore amounts withdrawn by the inmate against uncollected money;

(2) to correct accounting errors;

(3) to make restitution for wrongful withdrawals made by an inmate from the account of another inmate;

(4) to cover deposits until cleared;

(5) as directed by court order in accordance with Subsection (e);

(6) as part of an investigation by the department of inmate conduct involving the use of the account or an investigation in which activity or money in the inmate's account is evidence;

(7) to transfer money deposited in violation of law or department policy; or

(8) to recover money the inmate owes the department for indigent supplies, medical copayments, destruction of state property, or other indebtedness.

(g) The department shall withdraw money from an inmate's account under Subsection (e) before the department applies a deposit to that account toward any unpaid balance owed to the department by the inmate under Section 501.063.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.014 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 804, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.081, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 257, Sec. 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1998; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 807, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997. 75th Leg., ch. 1409, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1423, Sec. 8.34, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 8.10, 19.02(8), eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 326, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 767 (S.B. 865), Sec. 32, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 22.039, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 368 (H.B. 1221), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 501.015. PROVIDING DISCHARGED OR RELEASED INMATE WITH CLOTHING AND MONEY; BURIAL EXPENSES. (a) When an inmate is discharged or is released on parole, mandatory supervision, or conditional pardon, the department shall provide the inmate with:

(1) suitable civilian clothing;

(2) money held in the inmate's trust account by the director;

(3) cash, in an amount and in the manner described by Subsection (b); and

(4) a personal identification certificate obtained under Section 501.0165, if available.

(b) When an inmate is released on parole, mandatory supervision, or conditional pardon, the inmate is entitled to receive $100 from the department and transportation at the expense of the department to the location at which the inmate is required to report to a parole officer by the pardons and paroles division. The inmate shall receive $50 on his release from the institution and $50 on initially reporting to a parole officer at the location at which the inmate is required to report to a parole officer. If an inmate is released and is not required by the pardons and paroles division to report to a parole officer or is authorized by the pardons and paroles division to report to a location outside this state, the department shall provide the inmate with $100 and, at the expense of the department, transportation to:

(1) the location of the inmate's residence, if the residence is in this state; or

(2) a transit point determined appropriate by the department, if the inmate's residence is outside this state or the inmate is required by the pardons and paroles division to report to a location outside this state.

(c) The department may spend not more than $200 to defray the costs of transportation or other expenses related to the burial of an inmate who dies while confined in a facility operated by the institutional division.

(d) The director of the institutional division shall provide the comptroller with funds sufficient to maintain not less than $100,000 in a bank or banks in Huntsville, Texas, for the purpose of making prompt payments to inmates required by Subsection (b). Funds maintained in a bank under this subsection must be secured by bonds or other securities approved by the attorney general.

(e) A bank that maintains funds described by Subsection (b) shall make a weekly report to the comptroller on the condition of the funds.

(f) Subsection (a)(3) does not apply to an inmate who on discharge or release on parole, mandatory supervision, or conditional pardon is transferred from the custody of the institutional division to a state jail felony facility or who is subject to a felony detainer and is released to the custody of another jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.015 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 238, Sec. 7.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.082, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1423, Sec. 8.35, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 745, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1288 (H.B. 2161), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 501.0155. PROVIDING DISCHARGED OR RELEASED INMATE WITH DOCUMENTATION FOR EMPLOYMENT. When an inmate who is able to work, as determined by the department based on the inmate's age or mental or physical condition, is discharged or released on parole, mandatory supervision, or conditional pardon and the intended residence designated by the inmate is in this state, the department shall provide the inmate with relevant documentation to assist the inmate in obtaining post-release employment, including:

(1) as applicable, a copy of the inmate's job training record described by Section 497.094 and the inmate's work record described by Section 497.095; and

(2) for an inmate who completed a prerelease program required by a parole panel as a condition of release:

(A) a resume that includes any trade learned by the inmate and the inmate's proficiency at that trade; and

(B) documentation that the inmate has completed a practice job interview.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 364 (H.B. 918), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2020.

Sec. 501.016. DISCHARGE OR RELEASE PAPERS; RELEASE DATE. (a) The department shall prepare and provide an inmate with the inmate's discharge or release papers when the inmate is entitled to be discharged or to be released on parole, mandatory supervision, or conditional pardon. The papers must be dated and signed by the officer preparing the papers and bear the seal of the department. The papers must contain:

(1) the inmate's name;

(2) a statement of the offense or offenses for which the inmate was sentenced;

(3) the date on which the defendant was sentenced and the length of the sentence;

(4) the name of the county in which the inmate was sentenced;

(5) the amount of calendar time the inmate actually served;

(6) a statement of any trade learned by the inmate and the inmate's proficiency at that trade; and

(7) the physical description of the inmate, as far as practicable.

(b) If the release date of an inmate occurs on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the department may release the inmate on the preceding workday.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.016 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.083, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 501.0165. STATE-ISSUED IDENTIFICATION; NECESSARY DOCUMENTATION. (a) Before discharging an inmate or releasing an inmate on parole, mandatory supervision, or conditional pardon, the department shall:

(1) determine whether the inmate has:

(A) a valid license issued under Chapter 521 or 522, Transportation Code; or

(B) a valid personal identification certificate issued under Chapter 521, Transportation Code; and

(2) if the inmate does not have a valid license or certificate described by Subdivision (1), submit to the Department of Public Safety on behalf of the inmate a request for the issuance of a personal identification certificate under Chapter 521, Transportation Code.

(b) The department shall submit a request under Subsection (a)(2) as soon as is practicable to enable the department to provide the inmate with the personal identification certificate when the department discharges or releases the inmate.

(c) The department, the Department of Public Safety, and the bureau of vital statistics of the Department of State Health Services shall by rule adopt a memorandum of understanding that establishes their respective responsibilities with respect to the issuance of a personal identification certificate to an inmate, including responsibilities related to verification of the inmate's identity. The memorandum of understanding must require the Department of State Health Services to electronically verify the birth record of an inmate whose name and any other personal information is provided by the department and to electronically report the recorded filing information to the Department of Public Safety to validate the identity of an inmate under this section.

(d) The department shall reimburse the Department of Public Safety or the Department of State Health Services for the actual costs incurred by those agencies in performing responsibilities established under this section. The department may charge an inmate for the actual costs incurred under this section or the fees required by Section 521.421, Transportation Code.

(e) This section does not apply to an inmate who:

(1) is not legally present in the United States; or

(2) was not a resident of this state before the person was placed in the custody of the department.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1288 (H.B. 2161), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 501.0166. PROVIDING DISCHARGED OR RELEASED INMATE WITH BIRTH CERTIFICATE AND SOCIAL SECURITY CARD. (a) In addition to complying with the requirements of Section 501.0165 regarding a license or personal identification certificate for an inmate being discharged or released on parole, mandatory supervision, or conditional pardon, the department must:

(1) determine whether the inmate has a:

(A) certified copy of the inmate's birth certificate; and

(B) copy of the inmate's social security card; and

(2) if the inmate does not have a document described by Subdivision (1), submit to the appropriate entity on behalf of the inmate a request for the issuance of the applicable document.

(b) The department shall submit a request under Subsection (a)(2) as soon as is practicable to enable the department to provide the inmate with the applicable document when the department discharges or releases the inmate.

(c) This section does not apply to an inmate who:

(1) is not legally present in the United States; or

(2) was not a resident of this state before the person was placed in the custody of the department.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 364 (H.B. 918), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2020.

Sec. 501.017. COST OF CONFINEMENT AS CLAIM. (a) The department may establish a claim and lien against the estate of an inmate who dies while confined in a facility operated by or under contract with the department for the cost to the department of the inmate's confinement.

(b) The department may not enforce a claim or lien established under this section if the inmate has a surviving spouse or a surviving dependent or disabled child.

(c) The department shall adopt policies regarding recovery of the cost of confinement through enforcement of claims or liens established under this section.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.017 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.084, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 501.019. COST OF CONFINEMENT AS CLAIM; SETOFF. (a) The state may deduct from any monetary obligation owed to an incarcerated person:

(1) the cost of incarceration, if a cost of incarceration for the person can be computed; and

(2) any amount assessed against the person under Section 14.006, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, that remains unpaid at the time the monetary obligation is to be paid.

(b) In a case in which a person may be indemnified under Chapter 104, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, and that arises from a claim made by a person for whom a cost of incarceration can be computed, the court shall reduce the amount recoverable by the claimant by the amount of the cost of incarceration.

(c) The annual cost of incarceration of a person shall be computed using the average cost per day for imprisonment calculated by the Criminal Justice Policy Council.

(d) In making a deduction under Subsection (a) or in reducing an award under Subsection (b), the department or the court shall credit or debit a prorated portion of the cost of incarceration for a person incarcerated for 365 days or less in a year. The number of days of incarceration in a year includes time served before conviction.

(e) This section applies to a monetary obligation arising from a judgment against the state, an agency of the state, or an officer or employee of the state or an agency of the state, only if:

(1) the judgment awards damages for property damage or bodily injury resulting from a negligent act or omission, including an act or omission described by Section 101.021(1), Civil Practice and Remedies Code; and

(2) there is not a finding by the court of a violation of the constitution of this state or the United States.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 378, Sec. 7, eff. June 8, 1995.

Sec. 501.021. USE OF INMATES IN TRAINING PROHIBITED. The department may not use an inmate in a program that trains dogs to attack individuals without the inmate's permission.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.085, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 501.0215. EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMMING FOR PREGNANT INMATES. The department shall develop and provide to each pregnant inmate educational programming relating to pregnancy and parenting. The programming must include instruction regarding:

(1) appropriate prenatal care and hygiene;

(2) the effects of prenatal exposure to alcohol and drugs on a developing fetus;

(3) parenting skills; and

(4) medical and mental health issues applicable to children.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 650), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 501.022. INFANT CARE AND PARENTING. The department shall implement a residential infant care and parenting program for mothers who are confined by the department. To the extent practicable, the department shall model the program after the Federal Bureau of Prisons' Mothers and Infants Together program operated under contract in Fort Worth.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 824 (H.B. 199), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 501.023. INFORMATION CONCERNING FOSTER CARE HISTORY. (a) The department, during the diagnostic process, shall assess each inmate with respect to whether the inmate has at any time been in the conservatorship of a state agency responsible for providing child protective services.

(b) Not later than December 31 of each year, the department shall submit a report to the governor, the lieutenant governor, and each member of the legislature and shall make the report available to the public on the department's Internet website. The report must summarize statistical information concerning the total number of inmates who have at any time been in the conservatorship of a state agency responsible for providing child protective services, including, disaggregated by age, the number of inmates who have not previously served a term of imprisonment.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1032 (H.B. 2719), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 761 (H.B. 1191), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 501.024. VERIFICATION OF INMATE VETERAN STATUS. (a) The department, during the diagnostic process, shall record information relating to an inmate's military history in the inmate's admission sheet and intake screening form, or any other similar document.

(b) The department shall:

(1) in consultation with the Texas Veterans Commission, investigate and verify the veteran status of each inmate by using the best available federal data; and

(2) use the data described by Subdivision (1) to assist inmates who are veterans in applying for federal benefits or compensation for which the inmates may be eligible under a program administered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 261 (H.B. 634), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 281 (H.B. 875), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 501.023 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(24), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 501.025. VETERANS SERVICES COORDINATOR. (a) The department shall establish a veterans services coordinator to coordinate responses to the needs of veterans under the supervision of the department, including veterans who are released on parole or mandatory supervision. The veterans services coordinator, with the cooperation of the community justice assistance division, shall provide information to community supervision and corrections departments to help those departments coordinate responses to the needs of veterans placed on community supervision. The veterans services coordinator shall coordinate veterans' services for all of the department's divisions.

(b) The veterans services coordinator, in collaboration with the attorney general's office, shall provide each incarcerated veteran a child support modification application.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 987 (H.B. 865), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 501.026. LIMITATION ON CERTAIN SEARCHES. The department shall adopt a policy regarding a search of any room or other area that occurs while a female inmate who is not fully clothed is present in the room or area. The policy must:

(1) require that the search be conducted by a female correctional officer if one is available;

(2) include staffing procedures to ensure the availability of female officers; and

(3) provide that if it is necessary for a male correctional officer to conduct the search, the officer must submit a written report explaining the reasons for the search to the warden not later than 72 hours after the search.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 650), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 501.027. ACCESS TO PROGRAMS BY FEMALE INMATES. (a) The department shall develop and implement policies that increase and promote a female inmate's access to programs offered to inmates in the custody of the department, including educational, vocational, substance use treatment, rehabilitation, life skills training, and prerelease programs. The department may not reduce or limit a male inmate's access to a program to meet the requirements of this section.

(b) Not later than December 31 of each year, the department shall:

(1) prepare and submit to the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, each standing committee of the legislature having primary jurisdiction over the department, and the reentry task force described by Section 501.098 a written report that includes:

(A) a description of any department policies that were created, modified, or eliminated during the preceding year to meet the requirements of this section; and

(B) a list of programs available to female inmates in the custody of the department during the preceding year; and

(2) publish the report on the department's Internet website.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 3227), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 501.026 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(31), eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER B. GENERAL MEDICAL AND MENTAL HEALTH CARE PROVISIONS

Sec. 501.051. MEDICAL FACILITIES AT UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS MEDICAL BRANCH. (a) The medical facility constructed by the institutional division at The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston shall be used as a teaching facility and be limited to patients who are teaching patients, as long as the medical facility is used for the treatment of department patients. The Board of Regents of The University of Texas System shall maintain and operate the facility and provide professional staff services necessary for the care of patients in the facility, except that the department shall provide security at the facility. The facility shall provide the same level of care as is provided for patients in other facilities of The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston.

(b) If the medical facility ceases to be used for department patients, the facility shall revert to the medical branch for its use and be operated under the exclusive management and control of the Board of Regents of The University of Texas System.

(c) The medical facility shall be operated with funds appropriated for that purpose.

(d) The department shall establish and maintain an overnight holding facility for inmate outpatients at The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston.

(e) The department and The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston shall by rule adopt a memorandum of understanding that establishes the responsibilities of the department and the medical branch in maintaining the department's medical facility, providing security, and providing medical care. The memorandum must also establish a joint peer review committee and a joint utilization review committee. Each committee shall be composed of medical personnel employed by the department and by the medical branch. The joint peer review committee shall review all case files to determine whether the quality of medical care provided is adequate, according to accepted medical standards. The joint utilization review committee shall review all case files to determine whether treatment given is medically necessary under the circumstances of each case, taking into account accepted medical standards. The department shall coordinate the development of the memorandum of understanding.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.051 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.086, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 501.0515. PROCEDURES FOR TRANSPORTATION OF FEMALE INMATES FOR MEDICAL CARE. The department shall establish procedures to be used during the regularly scheduled transportation of female inmates for nonemergency medical care to The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston or another medical facility that provides medical services for inmates. The procedures must ensure that:

(1) any searches conducted are performed in an area and manner that conforms with the requirements of the Prison Rape Elimination Act of 2003 (34 U.S.C. Section 30301 et seq.) and any regulation adopted under that Act;

(2) buses used to transport female inmates are equipped with bathrooms and have an adequate supply of toilet paper and feminine hygiene products as defined by Section 501.0675 for the inmates being transported;

(3) female inmates receive sufficient food and nutrition in accordance with medical or nutritional standards as determined by the department; and

(4) facilities used to house female inmates overnight while being transported have an adequate number of beds for the inmates being transported.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1162 (S.B. 1146), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 501.052. MEDICAL RESIDENCIES. The department may establish a residency program or a rotation program to employ or train physicians to treat inmates in the department.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.052 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.087, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 501.053. REPORTS OF PHYSICIAN MISCONDUCT. (a) If the department receives an allegation that a physician employed or under contract with the department has committed an action that constitutes a ground for the denial or revocation of the physician's license under Section 164.051, Occupations Code, the department shall report the information to the Texas State Board of Medical Examiners in the manner provided by Section 154.051, Occupations Code.

(b) The department shall provide the Texas State Board of Medical Examiners with a copy of any report or finding relating to an investigation of an allegation reported to the board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.053 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.088, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.763, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 501.054. AIDS AND HIV EDUCATION; TESTING. (a) In this section, "AIDS," "HIV," and "test result" have the meanings assigned by Section 81.101, Health and Safety Code.

(b) The department, in consultation with the Texas Department of Health, shall establish education programs to educate inmates and employees of the department about AIDS and HIV. In establishing the programs for inmates, the department shall design a program that deals with issues related to AIDS and HIV that are relevant to inmates while confined and a program that deals with issues related to AIDS and HIV that will be relevant to inmates after the inmates are released. The department shall design the programs to take into account relevant cultural and other differences among inmates. The department shall require each inmate in a facility operated by the department to participate in education programs established under this subsection.

(c) The department shall require each employee of the department to participate in programs established under this section at least once during each calendar year.

(d) The department shall ensure that education programs for employees include information and training relating to infection control procedures. The department shall also ensure that employees have infection control supplies and equipment readily available.

(e) The department, in consultation with the Texas Department of Health, shall periodically revise education programs established under this section so that the programs reflect the latest medical information available on AIDS and HIV.

(f) The department shall adopt a policy for handling persons with AIDS or HIV infection who are in the custody of the department or under the department's supervision. The policy must be substantially similar to a model policy developed by the Texas Department of Health under Subchapter G, Chapter 85, Health and Safety Code.

(g) The department shall maintain the confidentiality of test results of an inmate indicating HIV infection at all times, including after the inmate's discharge, release from a state jail, or release on parole or mandatory supervision. The department may not honor the request of an agency of the state or any person who requests a test result as a condition of housing or supervising the inmate while the inmate is on community supervision or parole or mandatory supervision, unless honoring the request would improve the ability of the inmate to obtain essential health and social services.

(h) The department shall report to the legislature not later than January 15 of each odd-numbered year concerning the implementation of this section and the participation of inmates and employees of the department in education programs established under this section.

(i) The department may test an inmate confined in a facility operated by the correctional institutions division for human immunodeficiency virus at any time, but must test:

(1) during the diagnostic process, an inmate for whom the department does not have a record of a positive test result; and

(2) an inmate who is eligible for release before the inmate is released from the division.

(j) If the department determines that an inmate has a positive test result, the department may segregate the inmate from other inmates. The department shall report the results of a positive test to the Department of State Health Services for the purposes of notification and reporting as described by Sections 81.050-81.052, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.054 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.089, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1184 (H.B. 43), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 255 (S.B. 453), Sec. 1, eff. May 26, 2007.

Sec. 501.055. REPORT OF INMATE DEATH. (a) If an inmate dies while in the custody of the department, an employee of the facility who is in charge of the inmate shall immediately notify the nearest justice of the peace serving in the county in which the inmate died and the office of internal affairs for the department. The justice shall personally inspect the body and make an inquiry as to the cause of death. The justice shall make written copies of evidence taken during the inquest, and give one copy to the director and one copy to a district judge serving in the county in which the inmate died. The judge shall provide the copy to the grand jury and, if the judge determines the evidence indicates wrongdoing, instruct the grand jury to thoroughly investigate the cause of death.

(b) Subsection (a) does not apply if the inmate:

(1) dies of natural causes while attended by a physician or a registered nurse; or

(2) is lawfully executed.

(c) If an inmate dies as described by Subsection (b)(1), the department or an authorized official of the department shall immediately attempt to notify the next of kin of the inmate that the inmate has died, state the time of the inmate's death, and inform the next of kin that unless the next of kin objects to the department within eight hours of the stated time of death, an autopsy will be conducted on the inmate.

(d) If the next of kin consents to the autopsy or does not within eight hours of the time of death file an objection with the department about the autopsy, the department or an authorized official of the department shall order an autopsy to be conducted on the inmate. The order of an autopsy under this subsection constitutes consent to an autopsy for the purposes of Article 49.32, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(e) For purposes of this section, an "inmate in the custody of the department" is a convicted felon who:

(1) is confined in a secure correctional facility operated by or under contract with the department; or

(2) has been admitted for treatment into a hospital while remaining in the custody of the department.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.055 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.090, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1422, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 950 (H.B. 1009), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 501.0551. ANATOMICAL GIFTS. (a) The department, during the diagnostic process, shall provide each inmate with a form on which the inmate may indicate whether the inmate wishes to be an eye, tissue, or organ donor if the inmate dies while in the custody of the department.

(b) If an inmate indicates on the form that the inmate wishes to be a donor, the effect is the same as if the inmate executed a statement of gift under Section 521.401, Transportation Code.

(c) The department shall adopt procedures to provide inmates with the form described by Subsection (a).

(d) Expired.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1422, Sec. 3, eff. June 20, 1997.

Sec. 501.056. CONTRACT FOR CARE OF INMATES WITH MENTAL ILLNESS OR INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY. The department shall contract with the Health and Human Services Commission for provision of commission facilities, treatment, and habilitation for inmates with mental illness or an intellectual disability in the custody of the department. The contract must provide:

(1) detailed characteristics of the inmate population with mental illness and the inmate population with intellectual disabilities to be affected under the contract;

(2) for the respective responsibilities of the commission and the department with regard to the care and supervision of the affected inmates; and

(3) that the department remains responsible for security.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.056 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.091, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 446), Sec. 5.12, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 501.057. CIVIL COMMITMENT BEFORE PAROLE. (a) The department shall establish a system to identify mentally ill inmates who are nearing eligibility for release on parole.

(b) Not later than the 30th day before the initial parole eligibility date of an inmate identified as mentally ill, an institutional division psychiatrist shall examine the inmate. The psychiatrist shall file a sworn application for court-ordered temporary mental health services under Chapter 574, Health and Safety Code, if the psychiatrist determines that the inmate is mentally ill and as a result of the illness the inmate meets at least one of the criteria listed in Section 574.034 or 574.0345, Health and Safety Code.

(c) The psychiatrist shall include with the application a sworn certificate of medical examination for mental illness in the form prescribed by Section 574.011, Health and Safety Code.

(d) The institutional division is liable for costs incurred for a hearing under Chapter 574, Health and Safety Code, that follows an application filed by a division psychiatrist under this section.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.057 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.092, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 582 (S.B. 362), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 501.058. COMPENSATION OF PSYCHIATRISTS. The amount of compensation paid by the institutional division to psychiatrists employed by the division should be similar to the amount of compensation authorized for the Health and Human Services Commission to pay to psychiatrists.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.058 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 446), Sec. 5.13, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 501.059. SCREENING FOR AND EDUCATION CONCERNING FETAL ALCOHOL EXPOSURE DURING PREGNANCY. (a) The department shall establish a screening program to identify female inmates who are:

(1) between the ages of 18 and 44;

(2) sentenced to a term of confinement not to exceed two years; and

(3) at risk for having a pregnancy with alcohol-related complications, including giving birth to a child with alcohol-related birth defects.

(b) The screening program established under Subsection (a) must:

(1) evaluate the family planning practices of each female inmate described by Subsection (a) in relation to the inmate's consumption of alcohol and risk of having a pregnancy with alcohol-related complications;

(2) include an objective screening tool to be used by department employees administering the screening program; and

(3) occur during the diagnostic process or at another time determined by the department.

(c) The department shall provide:

(1) a brief substance abuse intervention to all female inmates identified by the screening program as being at risk for having a pregnancy with alcohol-related complications; and

(2) an educational brochure describing the risks and dangers of consuming alcohol during pregnancy to all female inmates.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 24, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 501.060. TUBERCULOSIS SCREENING. (a) The board will establish requirements for tuberculosis screening of department employees and volunteers in a manner similar to that established for jail employees and volunteers as outlined in Subchapter B, Chapter 89, Health and Safety Code.

(b) The institutional division shall provide tuberculosis screening for a person if:

(1) the person is an employee of:

(A) the institutional division;

(B) the correctional managed care plan operated by The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston; or

(C) the Texas Tech University Health Science Center Correctional Managed Care Plan; and

(2) the person requests the screening.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 786, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 501.059 by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 17.01(17), eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 501.059 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 385, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 501.061. ORCHIECTOMY FOR CERTAIN SEX OFFENDERS. (a) A physician employed or retained by the department may perform an orchiectomy on an inmate only if:

(1) the inmate has been convicted of an offense under Section 21.02, 21.11, 22.011(a)(2), or 22.021(a)(2)(B), Penal Code, and has previously been convicted under one or more of those sections;

(2) the inmate is 21 years of age or older;

(3) the inmate requests the procedure in writing;

(4) the inmate signs a statement admitting the inmate committed the offense described by Subsection (a)(1) for which the inmate has been convicted;

(5) a psychiatrist and a psychologist who are appointed by the department and have experience in the treatment of sex offenders:

(A) evaluate the inmate and determine that the inmate is a suitable candidate for the procedure; and

(B) counsel the inmate before the inmate undergoes the procedure;

(6) the physician obtains the inmate's informed, written consent to undergo the procedure;

(7) the inmate has not previously requested that the department perform the procedure and subsequently withdrawn the request; and

(8) the inmate consults with a monitor as provided by Subsection (f).

(b) The inmate may change his decision to undergo an orchiectomy at any time before the physician performs the procedure. An inmate who withdraws his request to undergo an orchiectomy is ineligible to have the procedure performed by the department.

(c) Either the psychiatrist or psychologist appointed by the department under this section must be a member of the staff of a medical facility under contract with the department or the institutional division to treat inmates in the division.

(d) A physician who performs an orchiectomy on an inmate under this section is not liable for an act or omission relating to the procedure unless the act or omission constitutes negligence.

(e) The name of an inmate who requests an orchiectomy under this section is confidential, and the department may use the inmate's name only for purposes of notifying and providing information to the inmate's spouse if the inmate is married.

(f) The executive director of the Texas State Board of Medical Examiners shall appoint, in consultation with two or more executive directors of college or university institutes or centers for the study of medical ethics or medical humanities, a monitor to assist an inmate in his decision to have an orchiectomy. The monitor must have experience in the mental health field, in law, and in ethics. The monitor shall consult with the inmate to:

(1) ensure adequate information regarding the orchiectomy has been provided to the inmate by medical professionals providing treatment or advice to the inmate;

(2) provide information regarding the orchiectomy to the inmate if the monitor believes the inmate is not adequately informed about the orchiectomy;

(3) determine whether the inmate is free from coercion in his decision regarding the orchiectomy; and

(4) advise the inmate to withdraw his request for an orchiectomy if the monitor determines the inmate is being coerced to have an orchiectomy.

(g) A monitor appointed under Subsection (f) is not liable for damages arising from an act or omission under Subsection (f) unless the act or omission was intentional or grossly negligent.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 144, Sec. 1, eff. May 20, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 593 (H.B. 8), Sec. 3.37, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 501.062. STUDY OF RATE OF RECIDIVISM AMONG SEX OFFENDERS. (a) The department shall conduct a long-term study, for at least 10 years after the date an orchiectomy is performed under Section 501.061, to measure the rate of recidivism among inmates who undergo the procedure.

(b) During the study period under Subsection (a), with respect to each inmate who undergoes an orchiectomy under Section 501.061 and who volunteers to undergo the evaluations described by this subsection, the department shall provide for:

(1) a psychiatric or psychological evaluation of the inmate; and

(2) periodic monitoring and medical evaluation of the presence of the hormone testosterone in the inmate's body.

(c) Before each regular session of the legislature, the department shall submit to the legislature a report that compares the rate of recidivism of sex offenders released from the institutional division who have undergone an orchiectomy to the rate of recidivism of those sex offenders who have not.

(d) The department may contract with a public or private entity to conduct the study required under this section.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 144, Sec. 1, eff. May 20, 1997.

Sec. 501.063. INMATE FEE FOR HEALTH CARE. (a)(1) An inmate confined in a facility operated by or under contract with the department, other than a halfway house, who initiates a visit to a health care provider shall pay a health care services fee to the department in the amount of $13.55 per visit, except that an inmate may not be required to pay more than $100 during a state fiscal year.

(2) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1046 (H.B. 812), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

(3) The inmate shall pay the fee out of the inmate's trust fund. If the balance in the fund is insufficient to cover the fee, 50 percent of each deposit to the fund shall be applied toward the balance owed until the total amount owed is paid.

(b) The department shall adopt policies to ensure that before any deductions are made from an inmate's trust fund under this section, the inmate is informed that the health care services fee will be deducted from the inmate's trust fund as required by Subsection (a).

(c) The department may not deny an inmate access to health care as a result of the inmate's failure or inability to pay a fee under this section.

(d) The department shall deposit money received under this section in an account in the general revenue fund that may be used only to pay the cost of correctional health care. At the beginning of each fiscal year, the comptroller shall transfer any surplus from the preceding fiscal year to the state treasury to the credit of the general revenue fund.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 257, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1998. Renumbered from Sec. 501.061 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(45), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 1), Sec. 65.02, eff. September 28, 2011.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1046 (H.B. 812), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1046 (H.B. 812), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 501.064. AVAILABILITY OF CORRECTIONAL HEALTH CARE INFORMATION TO INMATES. The department shall ensure that the following information is available to any inmate confined in a facility operated by or under contract with the department:

(1) a description of the level, type, and variety of health care services available to inmates;

(2) the formulary used by correctional health care personnel in prescribing medication to inmates;

(3) correctional managed care policies and procedures; and

(4) the process for the filing of inmate grievances concerning health care services provided to inmates.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 24, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 501.065. CONSENT TO MEDICAL, DENTAL, PSYCHOLOGICAL, AND SURGICAL TREATMENT. An inmate who is younger than 18 years of age and is confined in a facility operated by or under contract with the department may, in accordance with procedures established by the department, consent to medical, dental, psychological, and surgical treatment for the inmate by a licensed health care practitioner, or a person under the direction of a licensed health care practitioner, unless the treatment would constitute a prohibited practice under Section 164.052(a)(19), Occupations Code.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1227 (H.B. 2389), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 501.059 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(34), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 501.066. RESTRAINT OF PREGNANT INMATE OR DEFENDANT.

(a) The department may not place restraints around the ankles, legs, or waist of a pregnant woman in the custody of the department at any time after the woman's pregnancy has been confirmed by a medical professional, unless the director, the director's designee, or a medical professional determines that the use of restraints is necessary based on a reasonable belief that the woman will harm herself, her unborn child or infant, or any other person or will attempt escape.

(b) If a determination to use restraints is made under Subsection (a), the type of restraint used and the manner in which the restraint is used must be the least restrictive available under the circumstances to ensure safety and security or to prevent escape.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1184 (H.B. 3653), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 650), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 501.0665. CERTAIN INVASIVE SEARCHES PROHIBITED. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), any invasive body cavity search of a pregnant inmate shall be conducted by a medical professional.

(b) A correctional officer may conduct an invasive body cavity search of a pregnant inmate only if the officer has a reasonable belief that the inmate is concealing contraband. An officer who conducts a search described by this section shall submit a written report to the warden not later than 72 hours after the search. The report must:

(1) explain the reasons for the search; and

(2) identify any contraband recovered in the search.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 650), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 501.0666. NUTRITION REQUIREMENTS FOR PREGNANT INMATES. The department shall ensure that pregnant inmates are provided sufficient food and dietary supplements, including prenatal vitamins, as ordered by an appropriate medical professional.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 650), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 501.0667. INMATE POSTPARTUM RECOVERY REQUIREMENTS. (a) The department shall ensure that, for a period of 72 hours after the birth of an infant by an inmate:

(1) the infant is allowed to remain with the inmate, unless a medical professional determines doing so would pose a health or safety risk to the inmate or infant; and

(2) the inmate has access to any nutritional or hygiene-related products necessary to care for the infant, including diapers.

(b) The department shall make the items described by Subsection (a)(2) available free of charge to an indigent inmate.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 650), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 501.0668. DUTIES FOLLOWING MISCARRIAGE OR PHYSICAL OR SEXUAL ASSAULT OF PREGNANT INMATE. (a) In this section:

(1) "Physical assault" means any conduct that constitutes an offense under Section 22.01 or 22.02, Penal Code.

(2) "Sexual assault" means any conduct that constitutes an offense under Section 22.011 or 22.021, Penal Code.

(b) As soon as practicable after receiving a report of a miscarriage or physical or sexual assault of a pregnant inmate, the department shall ensure that an obstetrician or gynecologist and a mental health professional promptly:

(1) review the health care services provided to the inmate; and

(2) order additional health care services, including obstetrical and gynecological services and mental health services, as appropriate.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 424 (H.B. 1307), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 501.067. AVAILABILITY OF CERTAIN MEDICATION. (a) In this section, "over-the-counter medication" means medication that may legally be sold and purchased without a prescription.

(b) The department shall make over-the-counter medication available for purchase by inmates in each inmate commissary operated by or under contract with the department.

(c) The department may not deny an inmate access to over-the-counter medications as a result of the inmate's inability to pay for the medication. The department shall pay for the cost of over-the-counter medication for inmates who are unable to pay for the medication out of the profits of inmate commissaries operated by or under contract with the department.

(d) The department may adopt policies concerning the sale and purchase of over-the-counter medication under this section as necessary to ensure the safety and security of inmates in the custody of, and employees of, the department, including policies concerning the quantities and types of over-the-counter medication that may be sold and purchased under this section.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 1), Sec. 65.03, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 501.0675. PROVISION OF FEMININE HYGIENE PRODUCTS. (a) In this section, "feminine hygiene product" means:

(1) a regular or large size tampon with applicator;

(2) a regular or large size sanitary napkin or menstrual pad with wings;

(3) a regular size panty liner; or

(4) any other similar item sold for the principal purpose of feminine hygiene in connection with the menstrual cycle.

(b) On request of a female inmate, the department shall provide free of charge to the inmate up to 10 feminine hygiene products per day that comply with applicable federal standards for comfort, effectiveness, and safety.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 650), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 501.068. MENTAL HEALTH ASSESSMENT FOR CERTAIN INMATES. (a) Before the department may confine an inmate in administrative segregation, an appropriate medical or mental health care professional must perform a mental health assessment of the inmate.

(b) The department may not confine an inmate in administrative segregation if the assessment performed under Subsection (a) indicates that type of confinement is not appropriate for the inmate's medical or mental health.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 705 (H.B. 1083), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 501.069. DEVELOPMENTALLY DISABLED OFFENDER PROGRAM. (a) In this section, "offender" has the meaning assigned by Section 501.091.

(b) The department shall establish and maintain a program for offenders:

(1) who are suspected of or identified as having an intellectual disability or borderline intellectual functioning; and

(2) whose adaptive functioning is significantly impaired.

(c) The program must provide an offender described by Subsection (b) with:

(1) a safe environment while confined; and

(2) specialized programs, treatments, and activities designed by the department to assist the offender in effectively managing, treating, or accommodating the offender's intellectual disability or borderline intellectual functioning.

(d) The department may accept gifts, awards, or grants for the purpose of providing the services described by Subsection (b).

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 406 (H.B. 2189), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 501.068 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(15), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 501.070. TRAUMA HISTORY SCREENING. The department shall:

(1) screen each female inmate during the diagnostic process to determine whether the inmate has experienced adverse childhood experiences or other significant trauma; and

(2) refer the inmate as needed to the appropriate medical or mental health care professional for treatment.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 650), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 501.071. ACCESS TO TELEMEDICINE AND TELEHEALTH SERVICES AND ON-SITE MEDICAL CARE. The department, in conjunction with The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston and the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center, shall establish procedures to increase opportunities and expand access to telemedicine medical services and telehealth services, as those terms are defined by Section 111.001, Occupations Code, and on-site medical care for inmates, including on-site mobile care units that provide diagnostic imaging, physical therapy, and other appropriate mobile health services.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1162 (S.B. 1146), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER C. CONTINUITY OF CARE PROGRAMS; REENTRY PROGRAM

Text of section effective on June 19, 2009, but only if a specific appropriation is provided as described by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 643, Sec. 4, which states: This Act does not make an appropriation. This Act takes effect only if a specific appropriation for the implementation of the Act is provided in a general appropriations act of the 81st Legislature.

Sec. 501.091. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Correctional facility" means a facility operated by or under contract with the department.

(2) "Offender" means an inmate or state jail defendant confined in a correctional facility.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 643 (H.B. 1711), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 501.092. COMPREHENSIVE REENTRY AND REINTEGRATION PLAN FOR OFFENDERS. (a) The department shall develop and adopt a comprehensive plan to reduce recidivism and ensure the successful reentry and reintegration of offenders into the community following an offender's release or discharge from a correctional facility.

(b) The reentry and reintegration plan adopted under this section must:

(1) incorporate the use of the risk and needs assessment instrument adopted under Section 501.0921;

(2) provide for programs that address the assessed needs of offenders;

(3) provide for a comprehensive network of transition programs to address the needs of offenders released or discharged from a correctional facility;

(4) identify and define the transition services that are to be provided by the department and which offenders are eligible for those services;

(5) coordinate the provision of reentry and reintegration services provided to offenders through state-funded and volunteer programs across divisions of the department to:

(A) target eligible offenders efficiently; and

(B) ensure maximum use of existing facilities, personnel, equipment, supplies, and other resources;

(6) provide for collecting and maintaining data regarding the number of offenders who received reentry and reintegration services and the number of offenders who were eligible for but did not receive those services, including offenders who did not participate in those services;

(7) provide for evaluating the effectiveness of the reentry and reintegration services provided to offenders by collecting, maintaining, and reporting outcome information, including recidivism data as applicable;

(8) identify providers of existing local programs and transitional services with whom the department may contract under Section 495.028 to implement the reentry and reintegration plan; and

(9) subject to Subsection (f), provide for the sharing of information between local coordinators, persons with whom the department contracts under Section 495.028, and other providers of services as necessary to adequately assess and address the needs of each offender.

(c) The department, in consultation with the Board of Pardons and Paroles and the Windham School District, shall establish the role of each entity in providing reentry and reintegration services. The reentry and reintegration plan adopted under this section must include, with respect to the department, the Board of Pardons and Paroles, and the Windham School District:

(1) the reentry and reintegration responsibilities and goals of each entity, including the duties of each entity to administer the risk and needs assessment instrument adopted under Section 501.0921;

(2) the strategies for achieving the goals identified by each entity; and

(3) specific timelines for each entity to implement the components of the reentry and reintegration plan for which the entity is responsible.

(d) The department shall regularly evaluate the reentry and reintegration plan adopted under this section. Not less than once in each three-year period following the adoption of the plan, the department shall update the plan.

(e) The department shall provide a copy of the initial reentry and reintegration plan adopted under this section and each evaluation and revision of the plan to the board, the Windham School District, and the Board of Pardons and Paroles.

(f) An offender's personal health information may be disclosed under Subsection (b)(9) only if:

(1) the offender consents to the disclosure; and

(2) the disclosure does not violate the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-191) or other state or federal law.

(g) The programs provided under Subsections (b)(2) and (3) must:

(1) be implemented by highly skilled staff who are experienced in working with inmate reentry and reintegration programs;

(2) provide offenders with:

(A) individualized case management and a full continuum of care;

(B) life-skills training, including information about budgeting, money management, nutrition, and exercise;

(C) education and, if an offender has a learning disability, special education;

(D) employment training;

(E) appropriate treatment programs, including substance abuse and mental health treatment programs; and

(F) parenting and relationship building classes; and

(3) be designed to build for former offenders post-release and post-discharge support from the community into which an offender is released or discharged, including support from agencies and organizations within that community.

(h) In developing the reentry and reintegration plan adopted under this section, the department shall ensure that the reentry program for long-term inmates under Section 501.096 and the reintegration services provided under Section 501.097 are incorporated into the plan.

(i) Not later than September 1 of each even-numbered year, the department shall deliver a report of the results of evaluations conducted under Subsection (b)(7) to the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and each standing committee of the senate and house of representatives having primary jurisdiction over the department.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 643 (H.B. 1711), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 501.0921. RISK AND NEEDS ASSESSMENT INSTRUMENT. (a) The department shall adopt a standardized instrument to assess, based on criminogenic factors, the risks and needs of each offender within the adult criminal justice system.

(b) The department shall make the risk and needs assessment instrument available for use by each community supervision and corrections department established under Chapter 76.

(c) The department and the Windham School District shall jointly determine the duties of each entity with respect to implementing the risk and needs assessment instrument in order to efficiently use existing assessment processes.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 501.093. INMATES SUFFERING FROM DRUG OR ALCOHOL ABUSE. (a) The department and the Health and Human Services Commission shall by rule adopt a memorandum of understanding that establishes their respective responsibilities to establish a continuity of care program for inmates with a history of drug or alcohol abuse.

(b) An agency of the state not listed in Subsection (a) that determines that it may provide services to inmates with a history of drug or alcohol abuse may participate in the development of the memorandum, if the parties listed in this subsection approve the agency's participation.

(c) The memorandum of understanding must establish methods for:

(1) identifying inmates with a history of drug or alcohol abuse;

(2) notifying the pardons and paroles division and the Health and Human Services Commission as to when an inmate with a history of drug or alcohol abuse is to be released and as to the inmate's release destination;

(3) identifying the services needed by inmates with a history of drug or alcohol abuse to reenter the community successfully; and

(4) determining the manner in which each agency that participates in the establishment of the memorandum can share information about inmates and use that information to provide continuity of care.

(d) The Texas Commission on Alcohol and Drug Abuse shall coordinate the memorandum of understanding.

(e) The institutional division shall fund and operate a full service alcoholism and drug counseling program for chemically dependent inmates. The institutional division shall provide a sufficient number of alcoholism and drug counselors to provide counseling services for not less than 80 percent of those inmates in need of alcohol or drug counseling. The institutional division also shall provide a sufficient administrative and supervisory staff to organize, operate, and evaluate a program that motivates those inmates with a history of alcohol or drug-related problems to pursue a socially acceptable and chemically free lifestyle. The institutional division shall use funds received for these purposes and shall actively pursue federal grants for helping fund the program.

(f) The institutional division may require that inmates selected by the division attend a substance abuse treatment program that includes recognition and awareness of the disease concept of addiction. The institutional division may use suitable inmates as tutors in the program but must ensure that the inmate tutors do not exercise any authority over other inmates. The institutional division shall provide educational materials designed to assist an inmate in understanding the inmate's alcohol or drug dependency problem.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.093 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.093, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1269, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 446), Sec. 5.14, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 501.0931. IN-PRISON THERAPEUTIC COMMUNITIES. (a) The institutional division shall establish a program to confine and treat in in-prison therapeutic communities inmates determined by the division to have a history of drug or alcohol abuse and to need drug or alcohol abuse treatment. The program is in addition to existing educational and substance abuse treatment services provided to inmates.

(b) The institutional division and the Texas Commission on Alcohol and Drug Abuse shall jointly develop methods of screening and assessing inmates to determine their need for treatment for alcohol or drug abuse problems. The institutional division shall screen for alcohol and drug abuse each inmate who is transferred to the custody of the institutional division. The institutional division shall assess the inmates who are identified as having a substance abuse problem and shall determine the severity of the problem and the need for treatment.

(c) The program must consist of a treatment program of indeterminate length, not to exceed 12 months. The institutional division shall make a referral of an inmate to a program based on the severity of the substance abuse problem, eligibility of the inmate, and the availability of treatment space. An inmate who has not more than 12 months remaining in the inmate's sentence before the earliest date the inmate is eligible for parole is eligible for the program.

(d) The institutional division shall separate inmates participating in the program from the general population of the division and house the inmates in discrete units or areas within units, except during the diagnostic process or at other times determined to be necessary by the division for medical or security purposes. The institutional division shall separate an inmate who successfully completes the program from the general population of the division during any period after completion and before the inmate is discharged or released on parole or mandatory supervision from the department.

(e) The program provided under this section must contain highly structured work, education, and treatment schedules, a clearly delineated authority structure, and well-defined goals and guidelines. The institutional division shall establish a graded system of rewards and sanctions for inmates who participate in the program.

(f) The institutional division shall employ or contract with qualified professionals to implement the program. For purposes of this subsection, a "qualified professional" is a person who:

(1) is a licensed chemical dependency counselor;

(2) is a licensed social worker who has at least two years of experience in chemical dependency counseling; or

(3) is a licensed professional counselor, physician, or psychologist and who has at least two years of experience in chemical dependency counseling.

(g) The institutional division shall adopt:

(1) a procedure for determining which inmates are the best candidates for participation in the program, with priority for those inmates who volunteer;

(2) a procedure for determining which inmates may be required to participate in the program; and

(3) rules of conduct for inmates participating in the program.

(h) If the qualified professional implementing the program determines that an inmate is not complying with the rules of the program, the qualified professional shall notify the institutional division of that fact and the institutional division shall end the inmate's participation in the program and transfer the inmate out of the program.

(i) The institutional division shall provide at least 800 beds for housing participants in the program. The institutional division not less often than every two years shall determine whether the division should increase the number of beds provided by the division for the program.

(j) Neither the institutional division nor a qualified professional implementing the program may operate the program in a manner that automatically excludes inmates who do not volunteer to participate, and the division and the treatment provider shall attempt to encourage nonvolunteer inmates to participate.

(k) If funding is available, the Criminal Justice Policy Council, with the assistance of the institutional division, shall develop methods to evaluate the processes used by the division in providing the program and the level of success achieved by the program.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 490, Sec. 3, eff. Dec. 1, 1991. Transferred from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. art. 4413(401), Sec. 1.131 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 10, Sec. 9.02, eff. Aug. 29, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 988, Sec. 3.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.094, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 892, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 501.095. INMATES WITH HISTORY OF CHRONIC UNEMPLOYMENT. (a) The department and the Texas Employment Commission shall by rule adopt a memorandum of understanding that establishes their respective responsibilities to establish a continuity of care program for inmates with a history of chronic unemployment.

(b) An agency of the state not listed in this section that determines that it may provide services to inmates with a history of chronic unemployment may participate in the development of the memorandum, if the parties listed in this section approve the agency's participation.

(c) The memorandum of understanding must establish methods for:

(1) identifying inmates with a history of chronic unemployment;

(2) notifying the pardons and paroles division and the commission as to when an inmate with a history of chronic unemployment is to be released and as to the inmate's release destination;

(3) identifying the services needed by inmates with a history of chronic unemployment to reenter the community successfully; and

(4) determining the manner in which each agency that participates in the establishment of the memorandum can share information about inmates and use that information to provide continuity of care.

(d) The Texas Workforce Commission shall coordinate the development of the memorandum of understanding.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.095 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.095, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 11.62, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 817, Sec. 10.02, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 501.096. REENTRY PROGRAM FOR LONG-TERM INMATES. (a) The institutional division shall establish a program to assist inmates that have served long terms in preparing for their release from the division.

(b) In order to participate in the program established under this section, an inmate must:

(1) be serving a sentence of 30 years or longer;

(2) be within one year of the date projected for release;

(3) volunteer for participation in the program; and

(4) be approved for participation in the program by the institutional division.

(c) The institutional division shall provide to participating inmates academic and vocational education, employment counseling, and individual therapy. Services provided under this subsection must be designed to address the special needs of inmates who have served long terms of confinement in the institutional division.

(d) The department shall determine the special needs of inmates who have served long terms of confinement in the institutional division and shall identify and develop community resources to meet those needs.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 500.096 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.096, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 501.097. REINTEGRATION SERVICES. (a) The department and the Texas Workforce Commission shall by rule adopt a memorandum of understanding that establishes their respective responsibilities for providing inmates who are released into the community on parole or other conditional release with a network of centers designed to provide education, employment, and other support services based on a "one stop for service" approach.

(b) An agency of the state not listed in this section that determines that it may provide reintegration services to inmates similar to those described by Subsection (a) may participate in the development of the memorandum, if the department and the Texas Workforce Commission approve the agency's participation.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1360, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 501.0971. PROVISION OF REENTRY AND REINTEGRATION INFORMATION TO INMATES. (a) The department shall identify organizations that provide reentry and reintegration resource guides and shall collaborate with those organizations to prepare a resource guide that is to be made available to all inmates. At a minimum, the department shall collaborate with:

(1) nonprofit entities that specialize in criminal justice issues;

(2) faith-based organizations; and

(3) organizations that:

(A) offer pro bono legal services to inmates; or

(B) are composed of the families and friends of inmates.

(b) The department shall make the resource guide available in the Windham School District libraries and in each of the following areas of a correctional facility:

(1) peer educator classrooms;

(2) chapels;

(3) reintegration specialist offices; and

(4) any area or classroom that is used by the department for the purpose of providing information about reentry to inmates.

(c) The department shall make available a sufficient number of copies of the resource guide to ensure that each inmate is able to access the resource guide in a timely manner.

(d) The department shall identify organizations described by Subsection (a) that provide information described by Subsection (e) and shall collaborate with those organizations to compile county-specific information packets for inmates. The department shall, within the 180-day period preceding the date an inmate will discharge the inmate's sentence or is released on parole, mandatory supervision, or conditional pardon, provide the inmate with a county-specific information packet for the county that the inmate designates as the inmate's intended residence.

(e) At the minimum, a county-specific packet described by Subsection (d) must include, for the applicable county:

(1) contact information, including telephone numbers, e-mail addresses, physical locations, and mailing addresses, as applicable, of:

(A) workforce offices, housing options, places of worship, support groups, peer-to-peer counseling groups, and other relevant organizations or agencies as determined by the department and the collaborating organization;

(B) agencies and organizations that offer emergency assistance, such as food and clothing banks, temporary bus passes, low-cost medical assistance, and overnight and temporary housing; and

(C) agencies and organizations that offer mental health counseling; and

(2) information necessary for the inmate to apply for governmental assistance or benefits, including Medicaid, social security benefits, or nutritional assistance programs under Chapter 33, Human Resources Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 578), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 501.098. REENTRY TASK FORCE. (a) The department shall establish a reentry task force and shall coordinate the work of the task force with the Office of Court Administration. The executive director shall ensure that the task force includes representatives of the following entities:

(1) the Texas Juvenile Justice Department;

(2) the Texas Workforce Commission;

(3) the Department of Public Safety;

(4) the Texas Department of Housing and Community Affairs;

(5) the Texas Correctional Office on Offenders with Medical or Mental Impairments;

(6) the Health and Human Services Commission;

(7) the Texas Judicial Council;

(8) the Board of Pardons and Paroles;

(9) the Windham School District;

(10) the Texas Commission on Jail Standards;

(11) the Department of State Health Services;

(12) the Texas Court of Criminal Appeals;

(13) the County Judges and Commissioners Association of Texas;

(14) the Sheriffs' Association of Texas;

(15) the Texas District and County Attorneys Association; and

(16) the Texas Conference of Urban Counties.

(b) The executive director shall appoint a representative from each of the following entities to serve on the reentry task force:

(1) a community supervision and corrections department established under Chapter 76;

(2) an organization that advocates on behalf of offenders;

(3) a local reentry planning entity; and

(4) a statewide organization that advocates for or provides reentry or reintegration services to offenders following their release or discharge from a correctional facility.

(c) To the extent feasible, the executive director shall ensure that the membership of the reentry task force reflects the geographic diversity of this state and includes members of both rural and urban communities.

(d) The executive director may appoint additional members as the executive director determines necessary.

(e) The reentry task force shall:

(1) identify gaps in services for offenders following their release or discharge to rural or urban communities in the areas of employment, housing, substance abuse treatment, medical care, and any other areas in which the offenders need special services; and

(2) coordinate with providers of existing local reentry and reintegration programs, including programs operated by a municipality or county, to make recommendations regarding the provision of comprehensive services to offenders following their release or discharge to rural or urban communities.

(f) In performing its duties under Subsection (e), the reentry task force shall:

(1) identify:

(A) specific goals of the task force;

(B) specific deliverables of the task force, including the method or format in which recommendations under Subsection (e)(2) will be made available; and

(C) the intended audience or recipients of the items described by Paragraph (B);

(2) specify the responsibilities of each entity represented on the task force regarding the goals of the task force; and

(3) specify a timeline for achieving the task force's goals and producing the items described by Subdivision (1)(B).

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 643 (H.B. 1711), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Text of section effective on June 19, 2009, but only if a specific appropriation is provided as described by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 643, Sec. 4, which states: This Act does not make an appropriation. This Act takes effect only if a specific appropriation for the implementation of the Act is provided in a general appropriations act of the 81st Legislature.

Sec. 501.099. FAMILY UNITY AND PARTICIPATION. (a) The department shall adopt and implement policies that encourage family unity while an offender is confined and family participation in an offender's post-release or post-discharge transition to the community. In adopting the policies, the department shall consider the impact of department telephone, mail, and visitation policies on the ability of an offender's child to maintain ongoing contact with the offender.

(b) The department, when determining in which correctional facility to house an offender, shall consider the best interest of the offender's family and, if possible, house the offender in, or in proximity to, the county in which the offender's family resides.

(c) The department shall conduct and coordinate research that examines the impact of an offender's confinement on the well-being of the offender's child.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 643 (H.B. 1711), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 501.101. PROGRAMS AND SERVICES FOR WRONGFULLY IMPRISONED PERSONS WHO ARE DISCHARGED. (a) In this section, "wrongfully imprisoned person" means a person who:

(1) has served in whole or in part a sentence in a facility operated by or under contract with the department; and

(2) has:

(A) received a pardon for innocence for the crime for which the person was sentenced;

(B) been granted relief in accordance with a writ of habeas corpus that is based on a court finding or determination that the person is actually innocent of the crime for which the person was sentenced; or

(C) been granted relief in accordance with a writ of habeas corpus and:

(i) the state district court in which the charge against the person was pending has entered an order dismissing the charge; and

(ii) the district court's dismissal order is based on a motion to dismiss in which the state's attorney states that no credible evidence exists that inculpates the defendant and, either in the motion or in an affidavit, the state's attorney states that the state's attorney believes that the defendant is actually innocent of the crime for which the person was sentenced.

(b) The department shall ensure that the same programs and services that are available to or in which participation is mandatory for an inmate released on parole or to mandatory supervision, including programs and services offered or required under Subchapter F or G of Chapter 508, are available to a wrongfully imprisoned person when the person is discharged from the department.

(c) The executive director of the department may:

(1) adopt rules as necessary to implement this section; and

(2) direct the director of the Texas Correctional Office on Offenders with Medical or Mental Impairments to take any actions necessary to implement this section.

(d) The department shall provide information to wrongfully imprisoned persons as required by Section 103.002, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1389 (S.B. 1847), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 501.091 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 27.001(18), eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 698 (H.B. 417), Sec. 8, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 501.102. REENTRY AND REINTEGRATION SERVICES FOR WRONGFULLY IMPRISONED PERSONS. (a) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 698, Sec. 10, eff. June 17, 2011.

(b) The department shall develop a comprehensive plan to ensure the successful reentry and reintegration of wrongfully imprisoned persons into the community following discharge from the department. The reentry and reintegration plan developed under this section must include:

(1) life-skills, job, and vocational training for a wrongfully imprisoned person following discharge, for as long as those services are beneficial to the person;

(2) a requirement that the department provide, before a wrongfully imprisoned person is discharged from the department, the person with any documents that are necessary after discharge, including a state identification card; and

(3) the provision of financial assistance to aid a wrongfully imprisoned person in the reentry and reintegration process and in covering living expenses following discharge, in an amount not to exceed $10,000.

(c) The provision of financial assistance under Subsection (b)(3) shall be administered by the Texas Correctional Office on Offenders with Medical or Mental Impairments or the department.

(d) The amount of financial assistance provided to a wrongfully imprisoned person under Subsection (b)(3) shall be deducted from the amount of compensation provided to the person under Section 103.052, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

(e) The department may contract with private vendors or other entities to implement the comprehensive reentry and reintegration plan required by this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (H.B. 1736), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2009.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 501.091 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 27.001(19), eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 698 (H.B. 417), Sec. 10, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 501.103. ANNUAL REPORT. (a) Not later than December 31 of each year, the department's reentry and integration division and parole division shall jointly prepare and submit an annual report to:

(1) the governor;

(2) the lieutenant governor;

(3) the speaker of the house of representatives;

(4) the standing committees of the house and senate primarily responsible for criminal justice issues and corrections issues; and

(5) the reentry task force.

(b) The report must include the following information about parole during the year in which the report is submitted:

(1) the number of referrals of releasees for employment, housing, medical care, treatment for substance abuse or mental illness, education, or other basic needs;

(2) the outcome of each referral;

(3) the identified areas in which referrals are not possible due to unavailable resources or providers;

(4) community resources available to releasees, including faith-based and volunteer organizations; and

(5) parole officer training.

(c) The report must include the following information about reentry and reintegration during the year in which the report is submitted:

(1) the outcomes of programs and services that are available to releasees based on follow-up inquiries evaluating clients' progress after release;

(2) the common reentry barriers identified during releasees' individual assessments, including in areas of employment, housing, medical care, treatment for substance abuse or mental illness, education, or other basic needs;

(3) the common reentry benefits and services that reentry coordinators help releasees obtain or apply for;

(4) available community resources, including faith-based and volunteer organizations; and

(5) reentry coordinator training.

(d) The report required by Subsection (a) must be made available to the public.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1032 (H.B. 2719), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER D. INMATE HOUSING

Sec. 501.111. TEMPORARY HOUSING. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b) and Subsection (c), the institutional division may not house inmates in tents, cellblock runs, hallways, laundry distribution rooms, converted dayroom space, gymnasiums, or any other facilities not specifically built for housing.

(b) Temporary housing may be used to house roving inmate construction crews and inmates temporarily displaced only because of housing renovation, fire, natural disaster, riot or hostage situations, if the institutional division provides those inmates with reasonable sanitary hygiene facilities.

(c) The institutional division may house inmates in tents or tent-like structures unless prohibited by federal law or a specific court order.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 3, eff. June 16, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 845, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1993.

Sec. 501.112. MIXING CLASSIFICATIONS PROHIBITED. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the institutional division may not house inmates with different custody classifications in the same cellblock or dormitory unless the structure of the cellblock or dormitory allows the physical separation of the different classifications of inmates.

(b) If an appropriate justification is provided by the unit classification committee or the state classification committee, the board may permit the institutional division to house inmates with different custody classifications in the same cellblock or dormitory, but only until sufficient beds become available in the division to allow the division to house the inmates in the manner required by Subsection (a) and in no event for more than 30 days.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 3, eff. June 16, 1991.

Sec. 501.113. TRIPLE-CELLING PROHIBITED; SINGLE-CELLING REQUIRED FOR CERTAIN INMATES. (a) The institutional division may not house more than two inmates in a cell designed for occupancy by one inmate or two inmates.

(b) The institutional division shall house the following classes of inmates in single occupancy cells:

(1) inmates confined in death row segregation;

(2) inmates confined in administrative segregation;

(3) inmates assessed as having intellectual disabilities and whose habilitation plans recommend housing in a single occupancy cell;

(4) inmates with a diagnosed psychiatric illness being treated on an inpatient or outpatient basis whose individual treatment plans recommend housing in single occupancy cells; and

(5) inmates whose medical treatment plans recommend housing in a single occupancy cell.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 3, eff. June 16, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 446), Sec. 5.15, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 501.114. HOUSING REQUIREMENTS APPLICABLE TO PREGNANT INMATES. (a) The department may not place in administrative segregation an inmate who is pregnant or who gave birth during the preceding 30 days unless the director or director's designee determines that the placement is necessary based on a reasonable belief that the inmate will harm herself, her unborn child or infant, or any other person or will attempt escape.

(b) The department may not assign a pregnant inmate to any bed that is elevated more than three feet above the floor.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 650), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER E. MANAGED HEALTH CARE

Sec. 501.131. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Committee" means the Correctional Managed Health Care Committee.

(2) "Contracting entity" means an entity that contracts with the department to provide health care services under this chapter.

(3) "Medical school" means the medical school at The University of Texas Health Science Center at Houston, the medical school at The University of Texas Health Science Center at Dallas, the medical school at The University of Texas Health Science Center at San Antonio, The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston, the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center, the Baylor College of Medicine, the college of osteopathic medicine at the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth, or The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 501.132. APPLICATION OF SUNSET ACT. The Correctional Managed Health Care Committee is subject to review under Chapter 325 (Texas Sunset Act) regarding the committee's role and responsibilities. The committee shall be reviewed during the period in which the Texas Department of Criminal Justice is reviewed.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1112, Sec. 4.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1227 (H.B. 1116), Sec. 1.02, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 25, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 501.133. COMMITTEE MEMBERSHIP. (a) The committee consists of nine voting members and one nonvoting member as follows:

(1) one member employed full-time by the department, appointed by the executive director;

(2) one member who is a physician and employed full-time by The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston, appointed by the president of the medical branch;

(3) one member who is a physician and employed full-time by the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center, appointed by the president of the university;

(4) two members who are physicians, each of whom is employed full-time by a medical school other than The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston or the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center, appointed by the governor;

(5) two members appointed by the governor who are licensed mental health professionals;

(6) two public members appointed by the governor who are not affiliated with the department or with any contracting entity, at least one of whom is licensed to practice medicine in this state; and

(7) the state Medicaid director or a person employed full-time by the Health and Human Services Commission and appointed by the Medicaid director, to serve ex officio as a nonvoting member.

(b) An appointment to the committee shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointee.

(c) A committee member appointed under Subsection (a)(7) shall assist the department with developing the expertise needed to accurately assess health care costs and determine appropriate rates.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 1), Sec. 42.01, eff. September 28, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 501.134. PUBLIC MEMBER ELIGIBILITY. A person may not be a public member of the committee if the person or the person's spouse:

(1) is employed by or participates in the management of a business entity or other organization regulated by or receiving money from the department or the committee;

(2) owns or controls, directly or indirectly, more than a 10 percent interest in a business entity or other organization regulated by or receiving money from the department or the committee; or

(3) uses or receives a substantial amount of tangible goods, services, or money from the department or the committee other than compensation or reimbursement authorized by law for committee membership, attendance, or expenses.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 501.135. MEMBERSHIP AND EMPLOYEE RESTRICTIONS. (a) In this section, "Texas trade association" means a cooperative and voluntarily joined association of business or professional competitors in this state designed to assist its members and its industry or profession in dealing with mutual business or professional problems and in promoting their common interest.

(b) A person may not be an appointed member of the committee and may not be a committee employee employed in a "bona fide executive, administrative, or professional capacity," as that phrase is used for purposes of establishing an exemption to the overtime provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. Section 201 et seq.) and its subsequent amendments if:

(1) the person is an officer, employee, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of health care or health care services; or

(2) the person's spouse is an officer, manager, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of health care or health care services.

(c) A person may not be a member of the committee or act as the general counsel to the committee if the person is required to register as a lobbyist under Chapter 305 because of the person's activities for compensation on behalf of a profession related to the operation of the committee.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 1), Sec. 42.02, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 501.136. APPOINTMENT; TERMS OF OFFICE; VACANCY. (a) The two committee members appointed under Section 501.133(a)(4) serve concurrent four-year terms expiring on February 1 following the fourth anniversary of the date of appointment. On the expiration of the terms, the governor shall appoint one member from each of the next two medical schools that, based on an alphabetical listing of the names of the medical schools, follow the medical schools that employ the vacating members. A medical school may not be represented at any given time by more than one member appointed under Section 501.133(a)(4).

(b) The two committee members appointed under Section 501.133(a)(5) serve concurrent four-year terms expiring on February 1 following the fourth anniversary of the date of appointment.

(c) Public members appointed under Section 501.133(a)(6) serve staggered four-year terms, with the term of one of those members expiring on February 1 of each odd-numbered year.

(d) Other committee members serve at the will of the appointing official or until termination of the member's employment with the entity the member represents.

(e) If a vacancy occurs, the appropriate appointing authority shall appoint a person, in the same manner as the original appointment, to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term. If a vacancy occurs in a position appointed under Section 501.133(a)(4), the governor shall appoint a physician employed by the same medical school as that of the vacating member.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 1), Sec. 42.03, eff. September 28, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 501.137. PRESIDING OFFICER. The governor shall designate a public member of the committee who is licensed to practice medicine in this state as presiding officer. The presiding officer serves in that capacity at the will of the governor.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 27, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 501.138. GROUNDS FOR REMOVAL. (a) It is a ground for removal from the committee that a member:

(1) does not have at the time of taking office the qualifications required by Section 501.133;

(2) does not maintain during service on the committee the qualifications required by Section 501.133;

(3) is ineligible for membership under Section 501.134 or 501.135;

(4) cannot, because of illness or disability, discharge the member's duties for a substantial part of the member's term; or

(5) is absent from more than half of the regularly scheduled committee meetings that the member is eligible to attend during a calendar year without an excuse approved by a majority vote of the committee.

(b) The validity of an action of the committee is not affected by the fact that it is taken when a ground for removal of a committee member exists.

(c) If the managed health care administrator has knowledge that a potential ground for removal exists, the administrator shall notify the presiding officer of the committee of the potential ground. The presiding officer shall then notify the governor and the attorney general that a potential ground for removal exists. If the potential ground for removal involves the presiding officer, the managed health care administrator shall notify the next highest ranking officer of the committee, who shall then notify the governor and the attorney general that a potential ground for removal exists.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 501.139. MEETINGS. (a) The committee shall meet at least once in each quarter of the calendar year and at any other time at the call of the presiding officer.

(b) The committee may hold a meeting by telephone conference call or other video or broadcast technology.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 501.140. TRAINING. (a) A person who is appointed to and qualifies for office as a member of the committee may not vote, deliberate, or be counted as a member in attendance at a meeting of the committee until the person completes a training program that complies with this section.

(b) The training program must provide the person with information regarding:

(1) the legislation that created the committee;

(2) the programs operated by the committee;

(3) the role and functions of the committee;

(4) the rules of the committee with an emphasis on the rules that relate to disciplinary and investigatory authority;

(5) the current budget for the committee;

(6) the results of the most recent formal audit of the committee;

(7) the requirements of:

(A) the open meetings law, Chapter 551;

(B) the public information law, Chapter 552;

(C) the administrative procedure law, Chapter 2001; and

(D) other laws relating to public officials, including conflict-of-interest laws; and

(8) any applicable ethics policies adopted by the committee or the Texas Ethics Commission.

(c) A person appointed to the committee is entitled to reimbursement, as provided by the General Appropriations Act, for the travel expenses incurred in attending the training program regardless of whether the attendance at the program occurs before or after the person qualifies for office.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 501.141. COMPENSATION; REIMBURSEMENT. A committee member serves without compensation but is entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the duties of the committee.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 501.142. ADMINISTRATION; PERSONNEL. The committee may hire a managed health care administrator, who may employ personnel necessary for the administration of the committee's duties. The committee shall pay necessary costs for its operation, including costs of hiring the managed health care administrator and other personnel, from funds appropriated by the legislature to the department for correctional health care.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 501.143. DIVISION OF RESPONSIBILITIES. The committee shall develop and implement policies that clearly separate the policy-making responsibilities of the committee and the management responsibilities of the managed health care administrator and staff of the committee.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 501.144. QUALIFICATIONS AND STANDARDS OF CONDUCT INFORMATION. The managed health care administrator or the administrator's designee shall provide to members of the committee and to committee employees, as often as necessary, information regarding the requirements for office or employment under this subchapter, including information regarding a person's responsibilities under applicable laws relating to standards of conduct for state officers or employees.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 501.145. EQUAL EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITY POLICY. (a) The managed health care administrator or the administrator's designee shall prepare and maintain a written policy statement that implements a program of equal employment opportunity to ensure that all personnel decisions are made without regard to race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin.

(b) The policy statement must include:

(1) personnel policies, including policies relating to recruitment, evaluation, selection, training, and promotion of personnel, that show the intent of the committee to avoid the unlawful employment practices described by Chapter 21, Labor Code; and

(2) an analysis of the extent to which the composition of the committee's personnel is in accordance with state and federal law and a description of reasonable methods to achieve compliance with state and federal law.

(c) The policy statement must:

(1) be updated annually;

(2) be reviewed by the state Commission on Human Rights for compliance with Subsection (b)(1); and

(3) be filed with the governor's office.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 501.146. MANAGED HEALTH CARE PLAN.

(a) The committee shall develop and approve a managed health care plan for all persons confined by the department that:

(1) specifies the types and general level of care to be provided to persons confined by the department; and

(2) ensures continued access to needed care in the correctional health care system.

(b) To implement the managed health care plan, The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston and the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center, for employees who are entitled to retain salary and benefits applicable to employees of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice under Section 9.01, Chapter 238, Acts of the 73rd Legislature, Regular Session, 1993, may administer, offer, and report through their payroll systems participation by those employees in the Texas employees group benefits program and the Employees Retirement System of Texas.

(c) The committee shall provide expertise to the department, and may appoint subcommittees to assist the department, in developing policies and procedures for implementation of the managed health care plan.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 10A.514, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 501.147. POWERS AND DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT; AUTHORITY TO CONTRACT. (a) The department, in cooperation with the contracting entities, shall:

(1) establish a managed health care provider network of physicians and hospitals to provide health care to persons confined by the department; and

(2) evaluate and recommend to the board sites for new medical facilities that appropriately support the managed health care provider network.

(b) The department may:

(1) communicate with the legislature regarding the financial needs of the correctional health care system;

(2) monitor the expenditures of a contracting entity to ensure that those expenditures comply with applicable statutory and contractual requirements;

(3) address problems found through monitoring activities, including requiring corrective action if care does not meet expectations as determined by those monitoring activities;

(4) identify and address long-term needs of the correctional health care system;

(5) contract with any entity to fully implement the managed health care plan under this subchapter, including contracting for health care services and the integration of those services into the managed health care provider network;

(6) contract with an individual for financial consulting services and make use of financial monitoring of the managed health care plan to assist the department in determining an accurate capitation rate; and

(7) contract with an individual for actuarial consulting services to assist the department in determining trends in the health of the inmate population and the impact of those trends on future financial needs.

(c) In contracting for the implementation of the managed health care plan, the department shall:

(1) include provisions necessary to ensure that the contracting entity is eligible for and makes reasonable efforts to participate in the purchase of prescription drugs under Section 340B, Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Section 256b); and

(2) to the extent possible, integrate the managed health care provider network with the medical schools and the component and affiliated hospitals of those medical schools.

(d) For services that a governmental entity cannot provide, the department shall initiate a competitive bidding process for contracts with other providers for medical care to persons confined by the department.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 236, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 1), Sec. 42.04, eff. September 28, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 501.1471. REPORT. (a) Not later than the 30th day after the end of each fiscal quarter, the department shall submit to the Legislative Budget Board and the governor a report that contains, for the preceding quarter:

(1) the actual and projected expenditures for the correctional health care system, including expenditures for unit and psychiatric care, hospital and clinical care, and pharmacy services;

(2) health care utilization and acuity data;

(3) other health care information as determined by the governor and the Legislative Budget Board; and

(4) the amount of cost savings realized as a result of contracting for health care services under this subchapter with a provider other than the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center and The University of Texas Medical Branch.

(b) A contract entered into by the department for the provision of health care services must require the contracting entity to provide the department with necessary documentation to fulfill the requirements of this section.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 501.148. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES OF COMMITTEE.

(a) The committee may:

(1) develop statewide policies for the delivery of correctional health care;

(2) serve as a dispute resolution forum in the event of a disagreement relating to inmate health care services between:

(A) the department and the health care providers; or

(B) contracting entities; and

(3) report to the board at the board's regularly scheduled meeting each quarter on the committee's policy recommendations.

(b) The committee shall advise the department and the board as necessary, including providing medical expertise and assisting the department and the board in identifying system needs and resolving contract disputes.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154, Sec. 29(3), eff. September 1, 2013.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154, Sec. 29(3), eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 236, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 28, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 1), Sec. 42.05, eff. September 28, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 29(3), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 501.1485. CORRECTIONS MEDICATION AIDES. (a) The department, in cooperation with any contracting entity that is a medical school, shall develop and implement a training program for corrections medication aides that uses a curriculum specific to administering medication in a correctional setting.

(b) In developing the curriculum for the training program, the department and the medical school shall:

(1) consider the content of the curriculum developed by the American Correctional Association for certified corrections nurses; and

(2) modify as appropriate the content of the curriculum developed under Chapter 242, Health and Safety Code, for medication aides administering medication in convalescent and nursing homes and related institutions to produce content suitable for administering medication in a correctional setting.

(c) The department shall submit an application for the approval of a training program developed under this section, including the curriculum, to the Department of Aging and Disability Services in the manner established by the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission under Section 161.083, Human Resources Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 1), Sec. 65.04, eff. September 28, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 501.149. DISEASE MANAGEMENT SERVICES. (a) In this section, "disease management services" means services to assist an individual manage a disease or other chronic health condition, such as heart disease, diabetes, respiratory illness, end-stage renal disease, HIV infection, or AIDS, and with respect to which the committee identifies populations requiring disease management.

(b) A managed health care plan provided under this chapter must provide disease management services in the manner required by the committee, including:

(1) patient self-management education;

(2) provider education;

(3) evidence-based models and minimum standards of care;

(4) standardized protocols and participation criteria; and

(5) physician-directed or physician-supervised care.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 589, Sec. 6, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 501.150. QUALITY OF CARE MONITORING BY THE DEPARTMENT AND HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS. (a) The committee shall establish a procedure for monitoring the quality of care delivered by the health care providers. Under the procedure, the department shall monitor the quality of care delivered by the health care providers, including investigating medical grievances, ensuring access to medical care, and conducting periodic operational reviews of medical care provided at its units.

(b) The department and the medical care providers shall cooperate in monitoring quality of care. The clinical and professional resources of the health care providers shall be used to the greatest extent feasible for clinical oversight of quality of care issues. The department may require the health care providers to take corrective action if the care provided does not meet expectations as determined by quality of care monitoring.

(c) The department and the medical care providers shall communicate the results of their monitoring activities, including a list of and the status of any corrective actions required of the health care providers, to the committee and to the Texas Board of Criminal Justice.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 29, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 501.151. COMPLAINTS. (a) The committee shall maintain a file on each written complaint filed with the committee by a member of the general public. The file must include:

(1) the name of the person who filed the complaint;

(2) the date the complaint is received by the committee;

(3) the subject matter of the complaint;

(4) the name of each person contacted in relation to the complaint;

(5) a summary of the results of the review or investigation of the complaint; and

(6) an explanation of the reason the file was closed, if the committee closed the file without taking action other than to investigate the complaint.

(b) The committee shall make information available describing its procedures for complaint investigation and resolution.

(c) The committee, at least quarterly until final disposition of the complaint, shall notify the person filing the complaint and each person who is a subject of the complaint of the status of the investigation unless the notice would jeopardize an undercover investigation.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 30, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 501.152. PUBLIC PARTICIPATION. The committee shall develop and implement policies that provide the public with a reasonable opportunity to appear before the committee and to speak on any issue under the jurisdiction of the committee.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 501.153. ALTERNATIVE DISPUTE RESOLUTION. (a) The committee shall develop and implement a policy to encourage the use of appropriate alternative dispute resolution procedures under Chapter 2009 to assist in the resolution of internal and external disputes under the committee's jurisdiction.

(b) The committee's procedures relating to alternative dispute resolution must conform, to the extent possible, to any model guidelines issued by the State Office of Administrative Hearings for the use of alternative dispute resolution by state agencies.

(c) The committee shall designate a trained person to:

(1) coordinate the implementation of the policy adopted under Subsection (a);

(2) serve as a resource for any training needed to implement the procedures for alternative dispute resolution; and

(3) collect data concerning the effectiveness of those procedures, as implemented by the committee.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 31, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 501.154. USE OF TECHNOLOGY. The committee shall implement a policy requiring the committee to use appropriate technological solutions to improve the committee's ability to perform its functions. The policy must ensure that the public is able to interact with the committee on the Internet.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 31, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 501.155. AVAILABILITY OF CORRECTIONAL HEALTH CARE INFORMATION TO THE PUBLIC. (a) The committee shall ensure that the following information is available to the public:

(1) contracts between the department, the committee, and health care providers, and other information concerning the contracts, including a description of the level, type, and variety of health care services available to inmates;

(2) the formulary used by correctional health care personnel in prescribing medication to inmates;

(3) correctional managed care policies and procedures;

(4) quality assurance statistics and data, to the extent permitted by law;

(5) general information concerning the costs associated with correctional health care, including at a minimum:

(A) quarterly and monthly financial reports; and

(B) aggregate cost information for:

(i) salaries and benefits;

(ii) equipment and supplies;

(iii) pharmaceuticals;

(iv) offsite medical services; and

(v) any other costs to the correctional health care system;

(6) aggregate statistical information concerning inmate deaths and the prevalence of disease among inmates;

(7) the process for the filing of inmate grievances concerning health care services provided to inmates;

(8) general statistics on the number and types of inmate grievances concerning health care services provided to inmates filed during the preceding quarter;

(9) contact information for a member of the public to submit an inquiry to or file a complaint with the department or a health care provider;

(10) information concerning the regulation and discipline of health care professionals, including contact information for the Health Professions Council and a link to the council's website;

(11) unit data regarding health care services, including hours of operation, available services, general information on health care staffing at the unit, statistics on an inmate's ability to access care at the unit in a timely manner, and, if the unit is accredited by a national accrediting body, the most recent accreditation review date; and

(12) dates and agendas for quarterly committee meetings and the minutes from previous committee meetings.

(b) The committee shall make the information described by Subsection (a) available on the committee's website and, on request, in writing. The committee shall cooperate with the department and the health care providers to ensure that the committee's website:

(1) is linked to the websites of the department and the health care providers;

(2) is accessible through the State of Texas website; and

(3) can be located through common search engines.

(c) In determining the specific information to be made available under this section, the committee shall cooperate with the department to ensure that public disclosure of the information would not pose a security threat to any individual or to the criminal justice system.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 31, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 501.156. STUDENT LOAN REPAYMENT ASSISTANCE. (a) From funds appropriated for purposes of correctional managed health care, the committee may provide student loan repayment assistance for medical and mental health care physicians and other staff providing correctional managed health care. The repayment assistance may be applied to any student loan received through any lender for education at a public or accredited private institution of higher education in the United States, including loans for undergraduate, graduate, and medical education.

(b) The committee may adopt rules to implement this section, including rules governing eligibility for the loan repayment assistance and the terms of contracts between the committee and recipients of the loan repayment assistance. In adopting those rules, the committee shall consider the requirements of Subchapter J, Chapter 61, Education Code, and the rules of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board adopted under that subchapter.

(c) A physician may not receive loan repayment assistance under both this section and Subchapter J, Chapter 61, Education Code.

(d) Not later than December 1 of each state fiscal year, the committee shall submit a report to the Legislative Budget Board and the governor on the use of funds under this section for the preceding fiscal year.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 295 (H.B. 1908), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER F. ELIMINATION OF SEXUAL ASSAULT AGAINST INMATES

Sec. 501.171. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Correctional facility" means a facility operated by or under contract with the department.

(2) "Inmate" means an inmate or state jail defendant confined in a facility operated by or under contract with the department.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1217 (H.B. 1944), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 501.172. APPOINTMENT OF OMBUDSPERSON. The board shall appoint an ombudsperson to coordinate the department's efforts to eliminate the occurrence of sexual assault in correctional facilities. The ombudsperson shall report to the board.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1217 (H.B. 1944), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 501.173. POWERS AND DUTIES OF OMBUDSPERSON. (a) The ombudsperson shall:

(1) monitor department policies for the prevention of sexual assault in correctional facilities;

(2) oversee the administrative investigation of inmate complaints of sexual assault;

(3) ensure the impartial resolution of inmate complaints of sexual assault; and

(4) collect statistics regarding all allegations of sexual assault from each correctional facility in accordance with the standards established by the National Prison Rape Elimination Commission.

(b) The ombudsperson may collect evidence at correctional facilities and interview inmates or employees at correctional facilities in conducting an investigation of an inmate complaint of sexual assault under this section.

(c) The ombudsperson may not require an inmate who reports a sexual assault to assist in the investigation or prosecution of the offense.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1217 (H.B. 1944), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 501.174. DEPARTMENT TO ADOPT POLICY. The department shall adopt a policy providing for:

(1) a designated administrator at each correctional facility to post information throughout the facility describing how an inmate may confidentially contact the ombudsperson regarding a sexual assault;

(2) an inmate to write a confidential letter to the ombudsperson regarding a sexual assault;

(3) employees at correctional facilities, on notification of the occurrence of a sexual assault, to immediately:

(A) contact the ombudsperson and the office of the inspector general; and

(B) ensure that the alleged victim is safe;

(4) the office of the inspector general, at the time the office is notified of the sexual assault, to arrange for a medical examination of the alleged victim to be conducted in accordance with Subchapter G, Chapter 56A, Code of Criminal Procedure, or, if an appropriate employee of the office of the inspector general is not available at the time the office is notified of the sexual assault, a qualified employee at the correctional facility to conduct a medical examination of the alleged victim in accordance with that subchapter;

(5) a grievance proceeding under Section 501.008 based on an alleged sexual assault to be exempt from any deadline applicable to grievances initiated under that section; and

(6) each correctional facility to collect statistics on all alleged sexual assaults against inmates confined in the facility and to report the statistics to the ombudsperson.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1217 (H.B. 1944), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 469 (H.B. 4173), Sec. 2.47, eff. January 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 206 (S.B. 1401), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 501.175. OMBUDSPERSON TO MAKE AVAILABLE TO PUBLIC CERTAIN INFORMATION. The ombudsperson shall make available to the public and appropriate state agencies:

(1) information regarding the powers and duties of the ombudsperson; and

(2) statistical information regarding the total number of allegations of sexual assault investigated by the department, the outcome of the investigations, and any disciplinary sanctions imposed as a result of the investigations.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1217 (H.B. 1944), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 501.176. ANNUAL REPORT. (a) Not later than January 1 of each year, the ombudsperson shall submit a written report regarding the activities of the ombudsperson during the preceding fiscal year to:

(1) the governor;

(2) the lieutenant governor;

(3) the speaker of the house of representatives;

(4) the presiding officer of each house and senate committee having jurisdiction over the department;

(5) the board;

(6) the executive director;

(7) the state auditor; and

(8) the comptroller.

(b) The report must include public information regarding:

(1) each investigation and monitoring activity relating to sexual assault completed during the fiscal year by the ombudsperson and the inspector general; and

(2) statistics collected by the ombudsperson regarding allegations of sexual assault.

(c) The annual report must meet the financial reporting requirements of the General Appropriations Act.

(d) Upon review of the findings of the annual report submitted to the board, the board shall make recommendations on, or implement policy that has the goal of, lowering the rate and incidence of sexual assault against inmates at a correctional facility. That policy will include methods to address a correctional facility where the rate and incidence of sexual assault against inmates has not shown improvement.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1217 (H.B. 1944), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 501.177. STATE AUDITOR AUDITS, INVESTIGATIONS, AND ACCESS TO INFORMATION NOT IMPAIRED. This subchapter or other law related to the operation of the ombudsperson or the office of the inspector general does not prohibit the state auditor from conducting an audit, investigation, or other review or from having full and complete access to all records and other information, including witnesses and electronic data, that the state auditor considers necessary for the audit, investigation, or other review.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1217 (H.B. 1944), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 501.178. AUTHORITY OF STATE AUDITOR TO CONDUCT TIMELY AUDITS NOT IMPAIRED. This subchapter or other law related to the operation of the ombudsperson or the office of the inspector general does not take precedence over the authority of the state auditor to conduct an audit under Chapter 321 or other law.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1217 (H.B. 1944), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.